Colorado, session 2026A, HB1350.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Prior to the approval of propositions FF, MM, and LL
concerning the healthy school meals for all program, the state maintained
a number of mechanisms and programs to subsidize meals for students, each
with required appropriations; and
(b) The voter approval of propositions FF, MM, and LL concerning
the healthy school meals for all program is anticipated to be sufficient to
fully support school nutrition programs.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is necessary to
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

eliminate the requirement to appropriate money to the legacy meal
mechanisms and that the healthy school meals for all program may be used
to support school nutrition programs, if necessary.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-211, amend
(3)(a)(VII) and (3)(g); and add (3)(a)(IX), (3)(a)(X), (3)(a)(XI), and
(3)(a)(XII) as follows:
22-82.9-211. Healthy school meals for all program cash fund -
creation - uses - reporting requirements - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal.
(3) (a) Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly,
money may be expended from the fund that is not in the account for the
following purposes:
(VII) Beginning July 1, 2026, providing outreach related to the
supplemental nutritional assistance program; and
(IX) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, COMPLYING WITH THE REQUIREMENTS
FOR STATE MATCHING FUNDS UNDER THE FEDERAL "RICHARD B. RUSSELL
NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1751 ET SEQ.;
(X) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, ADMINISTERING THE START SMART
NUTRITION PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 22-82.7-103;
(XI) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, ADMINISTERING THE CHILD NUTRITION
SCHOOL LUNCH PROTECTION PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 22-82.9-104;
AND
(XII) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, ADMINISTERING THE SUMMER
ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER FOR CHILDREN PROGRAM PURSUANT TO
SECTION 22-2-149.
(g) If, upon awarding money according to subsection (3)(f) of this
section, the department determines that awarding money pursuant to this
subsection (3)(g) would result in a reserve calculation amount equal to
thirty-five percent or more, then money may be expended from the fund,
including money in the account in accordance with subsection (3)(a.5)(II)
of this section by awarding and distributing amounts from the fund as
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

described in subsection (3)(f) of this section and then funding the
implementation of the supplemental nutritional assistance program in a
manner that supplements and does not supplant the state's expenditures, as
of July 1, 2025, to implement the supplemental nutritional assistance
program; outreach related to the supplemental nutritional assistance
program; and community-based nutrition education; THE REQUIREMENTS
FOR STATE MATCHING FUNDS UNDER THE FEDERAL "RICHARD B. RUSSELL
NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1751 ET SEQ.; AND THE
SUMMER ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER FOR CHILDREN PROGRAM
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-2-149.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-123, amend (1);
and add (1.5) as follows:
22-54-123. Richard B. Russell national school lunch act -
appropriation of state matching funds - definition.
(1) For the 2001-02 budget year and budget years thereafter, The
general assembly shall MAY appropriate by separate line item an amount to
comply with the requirements for state matching funds under the federal
"Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1751 et
seq. The department of education shall develop procedures to allocate and
disburse the funds among participating school food authorities each year in
an equitable manner so as to comply with the requirements of said act.
(1.5) PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-82.9-211 (3)(a)(IX), SUBJECT TO
ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION MAY EXPEND AN AMOUNT FROM THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS
FOR ALL PROGRAM CASH FUND TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS FOR
STATE MATCHING FUNDS UNDER THE FEDERAL "RICHARD B. RUSSELL
NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1751 ET SEQ.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.7-102, amend
the introductory portion; and repeal (2) as follows:
22-82.7-102. Definitions.
As used in this article ARTICLE 82.7, unless the context otherwise
requires:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

(2) "Fund" means the start smart nutrition program fund created in
section 22-82.7-105.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.7-104, amend
(1); and repeal (2) as follows:
22-82.7-104. Program funding - appropriation.
(1) The general assembly shall MAY annually appropriate by separate
line item in the annual general appropriation bill an amount of not less than
seven hundred thousand dollars and not more than one million five hundred
thousand dollars to the fund created in section 22-82.7-105 TO THE
DEPARTMENT FOR DISTRIBUTION TO SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES to allow
school food authorities to provide free breakfasts to children participating
in the school breakfast program who would otherwise be required to pay a
reduced price for breakfast and to offset the costs incurred by facility
schools in providing breakfasts to students who are placed in the facility
and are eligible to participate in the school breakfast program. The
appropriation to the fund shall be DEPARTMENT MAY BE in addition to any
appropriation made by the general assembly pursuant to section 22-54-123
or 22-54-123.5 (1).
(2) The department may seek and accept gifts, grants, and donations
from public and private sources to fund the program, but receipt of gifts,
grants, and donations shall not be a prerequisite to the implementation of
the program. All private and public funds received through gifts, grants, and
donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the
same to the fund.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.7-105, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(a); repeal (1)(b); and add (4) and (5) as
follows:
22-82.7-105. Start smart nutrition program fund - creation -
administrative costs - repeal.
(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the start smart
nutrition program fund. The fund shall consist CONSISTS of:
(a) Such moneys as are MONEY AS IS appropriated to the fund by the
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

general assembly pursuant to section 22-82.7-104 (1); AND
(b) Any gifts, grants, or donations received by the department for the
fund pursuant to section 22-82.7-104 (2); and
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (1) TO (3) OF THIS SECTION,
ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (1) TO (3) OF THIS SECTION, ON
AUGUST 31, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
(5) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 22-82.7-106 as
follows:
22-82.7-106. Program - procedures.
The department shall develop procedures to allocate and disburse the
moneys in the fund THE MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR
THE PROGRAM among participating school food authorities and facility
schools each year, in an equitable manner and in compliance with the
requirements of the federal "Richard B. Russell National School Lunch
Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1751 et seq.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-105, amend
(1) as follows:
22-82.9-105. Program funding.
(1) For each fiscal year, the general assembly shall MAY make an
appropriation by separate line item in the annual general appropriation bill
to allow school food authorities to provide lunches at no charge for children
in state-subsidized early childhood education programs administered by
public schools or in kindergarten through twelfth grade participating in the
school lunch program who would otherwise be required to pay a reduced
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

price for lunch and to offset the costs incurred by a facility school in
providing lunch to students who are placed in the facility and are eligible
to participate in the school lunch program. The appropriation to the
department for the program must MAY be in addition to any appropriation
made by the general assembly pursuant to section 22-54-123 or 22-54-123.5
(1). The department may expend not more than two percent of the money
annually appropriated for the program to offset the direct and indirect costs
incurred by the department in implementing the program pursuant to this
part 1.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-302, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
22-82.9-302. Local school food purchasing program - creation
- rules.
(3) (a) In October 2024, and each October thereafter, subject to
annual appropriation IN A STATE FISCAL YEAR WHEN APPROPRIATIONS FROM
THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL PROGRAM FUND CREATED IN SECTION
22-82.9-211 DO NOT FULLY FUND THE AWARD OF LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING
GRANTS PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-82.9-205, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY
APPROPRIATE AN AMOUNT FOR the department shall TO reimburse each
participating provider at least five cents for every school lunch that the
participating provider prepared in the immediately preceding school year;
or a minimum of one thousand dollars, whichever is greater; except that a
participating provider is not reimbursed for the amount of value-added
processed products that exceeds twenty-five percent of the total of the
Colorado grown, raised, or processed products it purchased and that the
department may prorate these reimbursements as necessary.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-303, amend
(2) introductory portion as follows:
22-82.9-303. Local school food purchasing technical assistance
and education grant program - creation - report.
(2) Subject to available appropriations IN A STATE FISCAL YEAR
WHEN APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL
PROGRAM FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-82.9-211 DO NOT FULLY FUND THE
LOCAL SCHOOL FOOD PURCHASING TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND EDUCATION
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

GRANT PROGRAM PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-82.9-207, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE AN AMOUNT FOR the nonprofit organization
may TO award grants for the following:
SECTION 11. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to implement this
act, appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of education for use by school
district operations are adjusted as follows:
(a) The cash funds appropriation from the state public school fund
created in section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., for state match for the school
lunch program is decreased by $2,472,644;
(b) The cash funds appropriation from the state education fund
created in section 17 (4)(a) of article IX of the state constitution for the
child nutrition school lunch protection program is decreased by $841,460;
(c) The cash funds appropriation from the start smart nutrition
program fund created in section 22-82.7-105 (1), C.R.S., for the start smart
nutrition program is decreased by $296,484; and
(d) The general fund appropriation for summer electronics benefits
transfer for children is decreased by $229,097, and the related FTE is
decreased by 0.9 FTE.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $3,001,741 is appropriated to
the department of education for use by school district operations. This
appropriation is from the healthy school meals for all program fund created
in section 22-82.9-211 (2)(a), C.R.S. To implement this act, the department
may use this appropriation as follows:
(a) $2,472,644 for state match for the school lunch program;
(b) $235,000 for the child nutrition school lunch protection program;
(c) $65,000 for the start smart nutrition program; and
(d) $229,097 for summer electronics benefits transfer for children,
which amount is based on an assumption that the department will require
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

an additional 0.9 FTE.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year for the department of education for use by school district
operations if:
(a) The amount of cash funds appropriation from the state public
school fund created in section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for state match for
the school lunch program is less than the amount of the adjustment required
in subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(b) The amount of cash funds appropriation from the state education
fund created in section 17 (4)(a) of article IX of the state constitution made
in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for
the child nutrition school lunch protection program is less than the amount
of the adjustment required in subsection (1)(b) of this section;
(c) The amount of cash funds appropriation from the start smart
nutrition program fund created in section 22-82.7-105 (1), C.R.S., made in
the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for the
start smart nutrition program is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (1)(c) of this section;
(d) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for the summer
electronics benefits transfer for children is less than the amount of the
adjustment required in subsection (1)(d) of this section; or
(e) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of education for
use by school district operations for:
(I) State match for the school lunch program;
(II) The child nutrition school lunch protection program;
(III) The start smart nutrition program; or
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

(IV) The summer electronics benefits transfer for children.
SECTION 12. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that subsections (1) and (3) of section 11 of this act take effect only
if the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year
becomes law, in which case subsections (1) and (3) of section 11 of this act
take effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual general
appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 13. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1350

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1350